Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-24] Persons riding animals or
driving animal-drawn vehicles. Every person riding an animal or driving
any animal-drawn vehicle upon a roadway shall be granted all of the rights and
shall be subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle by
this chapter, except those provisions of this chapter which by their very
nature can have no application. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next